Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
HUNTING IN GENERAL

§183D-21 Hunting licenses required. No
person shall hunt, pursue, kill, or take any game bird or mammal without first
procuring a hunting license; provided that section 183D-32 to the contrary
notwithstanding, no license shall be required of persons who may be authorized
in writing by the board to destroy game birds or game mammals injurious to
forest growth or agriculture, or that constitute a nuisance or a health hazard.
[L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1998, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next